Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 2. Payments, Settlements, or Administration Without Appointment of Representative.

§ 64.2-606.
Transfer of certain vessels registered with U.S. Coast Guard and transfer of motor vehicles.

When a resident of the Commonwealth owning a vessel registered with the U.S. Coast Guard dies and there has been no qualification on the decedent’s estate, a transfer of ownership may be made by a legatee or distributee if he presents a statement made by him to the U.S. Coast Guard stating that (i) there has not been and there is not expected to be a qualification on the estate and (ii) the decedent’s debts have been paid in full or that the proceeds from the sale of such vessel will be used to apply against the decedent’s debts. The statement shall state the decedent’s name, residence at the time of death, and date of death, and the names of all other persons, if any, having an interest in the vessel who, if they have reached the age of majority, shall signify in writing their consent to such transfer of title.

A transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle may be made by a legatee or distributee pursuant to §

46.2-634

.

History.

1980, c. 731, § 64.1-123.2; 1994, c. 399; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-607.
Transfer of evidences of indebtedness, securities, and stock held in decedents’ estates.

When any executor or administrator duly appointed and qualified under this title has completed the distribution of the estate with the exception of transferring any evidences of indebtedness, securities, or stock in any corporation constituting a portion of such estate, such executor or administrator may file with the clerk of the court in which such executors or administrators qualified, a petition describing any such evidences of indebtedness, securities, and stock, stating that all debts of the decedent have been paid, and stating that a final accounting has been filed and approved. Upon receipt of the petition, the clerk shall issue a certificate certifying that the powers of such executor or administrator continue in full force and effect.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-121.1; 1952, c. 329; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-128; 2012, c. 614.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 36.

§ 64.2-608.
Transfer of securities of nonresident decedents.

The stocks, bonds, or evidences of indebtedness issued by (i) the Commonwealth or any corporation created by the Commonwealth or (ii) any national bank or any other corporation created pursuant to federal law that has its principal office in the Commonwealth that are held in the name of a decedent domiciled outside of the Commonwealth at the time of his death and who is not known by the officer or agent charged with the duty of transferring such stocks, bonds, or evidences of indebtedness to have a personal representative qualified as such within the Commonwealth, may be transferred by the executor or administrator of the decedent qualified according to the laws of the decedent’s domicile.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-122; 1950, c. 895; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-129; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-609.
Money and personal property belonging to nonresident decedents.

When any person, at the time of his death domiciled outside of the Commonwealth, owned stocks, bonds, securities, money, or tangible personal property located in the Commonwealth or was entitled to any debts, choses in action, or tangible personal property in the Commonwealth, the person, firm, or corporation holding such stocks, bonds, securities, money, debts, tangible personal property, and choses in action shall retain such assets for 90 days from the death of such decedent. After the 90-day period, the person, firm, or corporation shall pay over or deliver on demand such portion of the assets for which the person, firm, or corporation has received no legal notice of any lien or encumbrance to an executor, administrator, or other personal representative, qualified according to the laws of the decedent’s domicile if the value of such assets in the Commonwealth is, to the knowledge of the person holding or owing such assets, less than $25,000. When the value of such stocks, bonds, securities, money, debts, tangible personal property, and choses in action is $25,000 or more, the holder may pay or deliver such assets to an executor, administrator, or other personal representative, qualified in accordance with the law of the decedent’s domicile, 30 days after the holder gives public notice of his intention to make such a transfer by publication thereof once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the city, town, or county wherein the holder resides or has his principal place of business, provided that at the time of such payment or delivery, the holder has no actual notice of the appointment of a personal representative for such decedent in the Commonwealth and has received no legal notice of any lien or encumbrance upon such assets.

This section shall be construed as providing, as to the payment of money and the delivery of personal property belonging to nonresident decedents or their estates, optional methods of procedure in addition to those otherwise permitted or provided by law, including a comparable law of the state in which the nonresident decedents were domiciled, and shall not as to such matters add any limitations or restrictions to existing law.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-123; 1956, c. 536; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-130; 1970, c. 244; 1988, c. 370; 1996, c. 549; 2001, c. 368; 2009, c. 250; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532, in subsection A, substituted “$25,000” for “$15,000” twice.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts and estates for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1970).

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

For survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 631 (2009).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Satisfaction of legal requirement of other state. —

Personal property of a nonresident decedent may be transferred to the decedent’s personal representative or other appropriate recipient provided any requirements of Virginia law have been satisfied by a comparable legal requirement of another state. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Patricia S. Ticer, Member, Senate of Virginia, 07-102 (1/10/08) (decided under prior law).

§ 64.2-610.
When court may allow another to qualify on estate.

Except during the pendency of a suit to contest the decedent’s will or during the infancy or absence of the executor, the court where the will was admitted to probate or that has jurisdiction to grant administration on the decedent’s estate, or the clerk of such court, shall, if there has been no executor or administrator on the decedent’s estate for more than two months and on the motion of any person, order any person of the county or city to take into his possession the estate of such decedent and administer the same after requiring such person post a proper bond. However, any sheriff so ordered may decline the appointment if the appointment interferes with his current duties or obligations. The person ordered to take possession of the decedent’s estate shall be the administrator, or administrator de bonis non, of the decedent, with his will annexed, if there be a will, and shall be entitled to all the rights and bound to perform all the duties of such administrator.

The court may, on reasonable notice to the person appointed, revoke the order made by it or its clerk and the court may, after reasonable notice to the parties in interest, permit the person to resign and allow any other person to qualify as executor or administrator.

When an estate is committed to a person pursuant to subsection A on the motion of a creditor or other person, the state tax due for such administration shall be paid by the party who made the motion and such tax shall be repaid to him by the administrator so appointed out of the first funds received by him for such estate.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-124; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-131; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 1980, c. 438; 1996, c. 317; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-611.
Disposition by sheriff of property when no person entitled thereto.

If any sheriff has in his possession any money or personal property of a decedent and, after reasonable diligence, is unable to ascertain the identity of any person entitled to such property, the sheriff shall sell such property at public auction within two years of coming into possession of such property. The sheriff shall post notices of the date, time, and place of the sale at least 10 days before the sale in three or more public places in his jurisdiction, or shall advertise the date, time, and place of the sale at least 10 days before the sale in a newspaper published or having general circulation in his jurisdiction. The proceeds of the sale of personal property, together with any such money of the decedent in the sheriff’s possession, after the payment of all necessary expenses, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Literary Fund.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-125; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-132; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 2012, c. 614.